Hawaii statutes.
[§481D-1] Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Going out of business sale" means
any sale, whether described by that name or any other name including but not
limited to "closing out sale", "lost our lease sale",
"forced to vacate sale", and "inventory close out sale",
held in a manner as to induce a belief that upon disposal of the stock of goods
on hand, the business will cease and be discontinued at the premises where the
sale is conducted, and that otherwise complies with all applicable laws and rules
relating to sales and conduct of sales.

"Goods" includes all goods, wares,
merchandise, and other personal property, excepting choses in action and money.

"Person" includes a person, firm,
corporation, partnership, association, or two or more persons having a joint or
common interest.

"Removal sale" means any sale held in
such a manner as to induce a belief that upon disposal of the stock of goods on
hand, the business will cease and be discontinued at the premises where the
sale is conducted, and thereafter will be moved to occupy another location. [L
1994, c 98, pt of §1; am L 1996, c 271, §3]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next